fr: Compléments alimentaires: Aloe vera; CBD; Caféine; Calcium; Collagène; Créatine; Électrolytes; Fibre; Iode; Fer; L-carnitine; Magnésium; Manganèse; Acides gras oméga; Potassium; Probiotiques; Protéine; Sélénium; Sodium; Spiruline; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamine E; Vitamin K; Zinc; Autre
da: Kosttilskud: Aloe vera; CBD; Koffein; Calcium; Kollagen; Kreatin; Elektrolytter; Fiber; Jod; Jern; L-carnitin; Magnesium; Mangan; Omega-fedtsyrer; Kalium; Probiotika; Protein; Selen; Natrium; Spirulina; A-vitamin; B-vitamin; C-vitamin; D-vitamin; E-vitamin; K-vitamin; Zink; Andet
nb: Kosttilskudd: Aloe vera; CBD; Koffein; Kalsium; Kollagen; Kreatin; Elektrolytter; Fiber; Jod; Jern; L-carnitin; Magnesium; Mangan; Omegafettsyrer; Kalium; Probiotika; Protein; Selen; Natrium; Spirulina; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Sink; Annen
hr-HR: Dodaci prehrani: Aloja; CBD; Kofein; Kalcij; Kolagen; Kreatin; Elektroliti; Vlakna; Jod; Željezo; L-karnitin; Magnezij; Mangan; Omega masne kiseline; Kalij; Probiotici; Bjelančevine; Selen; Natrij; Spirulina; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Cink; Ostalo
vi: Thực phẩm chức năng: Nha đam; CBD; Caffein; Canxi; Collagen; Creatine; Chất điện giải; Sợi; Iốt; Sắt; L-carnitine; Magiê; Mangan; Axit béo omega; Kali; Men vi sinh; Protein; Selen; Natri; Tảo xoắn; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Kẽm; Khác
ja: 栄養補助食品: アロエベラ; CBD; カフェイン; カルシウム; コラーゲン; クレアチン; 電解質; 繊維; ヨウ素; 鉄; L-カルニチン; マグネシウム; マンガン; オメガ脂肪酸; カリウム; プロバイオティクス; プロテイン; セレン; ナトリウム; スピルリナ; ビタミンA; ビタミンB; ビタミンC; ビタミンD; ビタミンE; ビタミンK; 亜鉛; その他
sv: Kosttillskott: Aloe vera; CBD; Koffein; Kalcium; Kollagen; Kreatin; Elektrolyter; Fiber; Jod; Järn; L-karnitin; Magnesium; Mangan; Omegafettsyror; Kalium; Probiotika; Protein; Selen; Natrium; Spirulina; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Zink; Annat
it: Supplementi dietetici: Aloe vera; CBD; Caffeina; Calcio; Collagene; Creatina; Elettroliti; Fibra; Iodio; Ferro; L-carnitina; Magnesio; Manganese; Acidi grassi Omega; Potassio; Probiotici; Proteine; Selenio; Sodio; Spirulina; Vitamina A; Vitamina B; Vitamina C; Vitamina D; Vitamina E; Vitamina K; Zinco; Altro
ro-RO: Suplimente alimentare: Aloe vera; CBD; Cofeină; Calciu; Colagen; Creatină; Electroliți; Fibre; Iod; Iron; L-carnitină; Magneziu; Mangan; Acizi grași Omega; Potasiu; Probiotice; Proteine; Seleniu; Sodiu; Spirulină; Vitamina A; Vitamina B; Vitamina C; Vitamin D; Vitamina E; Vitamina K; Zinc; Altele
en: Dietary supplements: Aloe vera; CBD; Caffeine; Calcium; Collagen; Creatine; Electrolytes; Fiber; Iodine; Iron; L-carnitine; Magnesium; Manganese; Omega fatty acids; Potassium; Probiotics; Protein; Selenium; Sodium; Spirulina; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Zinc; Other
lt-LT: Maisto papildai: Alijošius; Kanabinoidai; Kofeinas; Kalcis; Kolagenas; Kreatinas; Elektrolitai; Skaidulos; Jodas; „Iron“ (tiesių smūgių); L-karnitinas; Magnis; Manganas; Omega riebalų rūgštys; Kalis; Probiotikai; Baltymai; Selenas; Natris; Spirulina; Vitaminas A; Vitaminas B; Vitaminas C; Vitaminas D; Vitaminas E; Vitaminas K; Cinkas; Kita
es: Suplementos dietéticos: Aloe vera; CBD; Cafeína; Calcio; Colágeno; Creatina; Electrolitos; Fibra; Yodo; Hierro; L-carnitina; Magnesio; Manganeso; Ácidos grasos omega; Potasio; Probióticos; Proteína; Selenio; Sodio; Espirulina; Vitamina A; Vitamina B; Vitamina C; Vitamina D; Vitamina E; Vitamina K; Zinc; Otros
de: Nahrungsergänzungsmittel: Aloe vera; CBD; Koffein; Kalzium; Kollagen; Kreatin; Elektrolyte; Faser; Jod; Eisen; L-Carnitine; Magnesium; Mangan; Omega-Fettsäuren; Kalium; Probiotika; Protein; Selen; Natrium; Spirulina; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Zink; Sonstiges
pl: Suplementy diety: Aloes zwyczajny; CBD; Kofeina; Wapń; Kolagen; Kreatyna; Elektrolity; Włókna; Jod; Żelazo; L-karnityna; Magnez; Mangan; Kwasy tłuszczowe omega; Potas; Probiotyki; Białko; Selen; Sód; Spirulina; Witamina A; Witamina B; Witamina C; Witamina D; Witamina E; Witamina K; Cynk; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Prehranska dopolnila: Aloe vera; CBD; Kofein; Kalcij; Kolagen; Kreatin; Elektroliti; Vlaknine; Jod; Železo; L-karnitin; Magnezij; Mangan; Omega maščobne kisline; Kalij; Probiotiki; Beljakovine; Selen; Natrij; Spirulina; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Cink; Drugo
ko: 식이 보충제: 알로에 베라; CBD; 카페인; 칼슘; 콜라겐; 크레아틴; 전해질; 섬유; 아이오딘; 철; L-카르니틴; 마그네슘; 망가니즈; 오메가 지방산; 포타슘; 프로바이오틱스; 단백질; 셀레늄; 소듐; 스피룰리나; 비타민 A; 비타민 B; 비타민 C; 비타민 D; 비타민 E; 비타민 K; 아연; 기타
nl: Voedingssupplementen: Aloe vera; CBD; Cafeïne; Calcium; Collageen; Creatine; Elektrolyten; Vezel; Jodium; IJzer; L-carnitine; Magnesium; Mangaan; Omega-vetzuren; Kalium; Probiotica; Eiwit; Selenium; Natrium; Spirulina; Vitamine A; Vitamine B; Vitamine C; Vitamine D; Vitamine E; Vitamine K; Zink; Andere
fi: Ravintolisät: Aloe vera; CBD; Kofeiini; Kalsium; Kollageeni; Kreatiini; Elektrolyytit; Kuitu; Jodi; Rauta; L-karnitiini; Magnesium; Mangaani; Omega-rasvahapot; Kalium; Probiootit; Proteiini; Seleeni; Natrium; Spirulina; A-vitamiini; B-vitamiini; C-vitamiini; D-vitamiini; E-vitamiini; K-vitamiini; Sinkki; Muu
ru: Диетические добавки: Алоэ вера; CBD; Кофеин; Кальций; Коллаген; Креатин; Электролиты; Клетчатка; Йод; Железо; L-карнитин; Магний; Марганец; Омега-3 жирные кислоты; Калий; Пробиотики; Белок; Селен; Натрий; Спирулина; Витамин А; Витамин B; Витамин С; Витамин D; Витамин Е; Витамин K; Цинк; Другое
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์เสริมอาหาร: ว่านหางจระเข้; CBD; คาเฟอีน; แคลเซียม; คอลลาเจน; ครีเอทีน; อิเล็กโทรไลต์; ไฟเบอร์; ไอโอดีน; เหล็ก; แอล-คาร์นิทีน; แมกนีเซียม; แมงกานีส; กรดไขมันโอเมก้า; โพแทสเซียม; โพรไบโอติก; โปรตีน; ซีลีเนียม; โซเดียม; สไปรูรินา; วิตามินเอ; วิตามินบี; วิตามินซี; วิตามินดี; วิตามินอี; วิตามินเค; สังกะสี; อื่นๆ
tr: Diyet takviyeleri: Aloe vera; CBD; Kafein; Kalsiyum; Kollajen; Kreatin; Elektrolitler; Fiber; İyot; Demir; L-karnitin; Magnezyum; Manganez; Omega yağ asitleri; Potasyum; Probiyotikler; Protein; Selenyum; Sodyum; Spirulina; A vitamini; B vitamini; C Vitamini; D vitamini; E vitamini; K vitamini; Çinko; Diğer
cs: Doplňky stravy: Aloe pravá; CBD; Kofein; Vápník; Kolagen; Kreatin; Elektrolyty; Vlákno; Jód; Železo; L-karnitin; Hořčík; Mangan; Omega mastné kyseliny; Draslík; Probiotika; Protein; Selen; Sodík; Spirulina; Vitamín A; Vitamín B; Vitamín C; Vitamín D; Vitamín E; Vitamín K; Zinek; Jiné
zh-CN: 膳食补充剂: 芦荟; 大麻二酚; 咖啡因; 钙; 胶原; 肌酸; 电解质; 纤维; 碘; 铁; 左旋肉碱; 镁; 锰; 欧米伽脂肪酸; 钾; 益生菌; 蛋白质; 硒; 钠; 螺旋藻; 维生素 A; 维生素 B; 维生素 C; 维生素 D; 维生素 E; 维生素 K; 锌; 其他
hu: Étrend-kiegészítők: Aloe vera; CBD; Koffein; Kalcium; Kollagén; Kreatin; Elektrolitok; Rost; Jód; Vas; L-karnitin; Magnézium; Mangán; Omega-zsírsavak; Kálium; Probiotikumok; Fehérje; Szelén; Nátrium; Spirulina; A-vitamin; B-vitamin; C-vitamin; D-vitamin; E-vitamin; K-vitamin; Cink; Egyéb
pt-PT: Suplementos dietéticos: Aloé vera; CBD; Cafeína; Cálcio; Colagénio; Creatina; Eletrólitos; Fibra; Iodo; Ferro; L-carnitina; Magnésio; Manganês; Ácidos gordos ómega; Potássio; Probióticos; Proteína; Selénio; Sódio; Espirulina; Vitamina A; Vitamina B; Vitamina C; Vitamina D; Vitamina E; Vitamina K; Zinco; Outro
el: Συμπληρώματα διατροφής: Αλόη βέρα; CBD; Καφεΐνη; Ασβέστιο; Κολλαγόνο; Κρεατίνη; Ηλεκτρολύτες; Φυτικές ίνες; Ιώδιο; Σίδερο; L-καρνιτίνη; Μαγνήσιο; Μαγγάνιο; Ωμέγα λιπαρά οξέα; Κάλιο; Προβιοτικά; Πρωτεΐνη; Σελήνιο; Νάτριο; Σπιρουλίνα; Βιταμίνη Α; Βιταμίνη Β; Βιταμίνη C; Βιταμίνη D; Βιταμίνη Ε; Βιταμίνη Κ; Τσίγκος; Άλλο
bg-BG: Хранителни добавки: Алое вера; CBD; Кофеин; Калций; Колаген; Креатин; Електролити; Фибри; Йод; Желязо; L-карнитин; Магнезий; Манган; Омега мастни киселини; Калий; Пробиотици; Протеин; Селен; Натрий; Спирулина; Витамин А; Витамин В; Витамин С; Витамин D; Витамин Е; Витамин К; Цинк; Други
pt-BR: Suplementos dietéticos: Aloe vera; CBD; Cafeína; Cálcio; Colágeno; Creatina; Eletrólitos; Fibra; Iodo; Ferro; L-carnitina; Magnésio; Manganês; Ácidos graxos ômega; Potássio; Probióticos; Proteína; Selênio; Sódio; Espirulina; Vitamina A; Vitamina B; Vitamina C; Vitamina D; Vitamina E; Vitamina K; Zinco; Outro
sk-SK: Výživové doplnky: Aloe vera; CBD; Kofeín; Vápnik; Kolagén; Kreatín; Elektrolyty; Vláknina; Jód; Železo; L-karnitín; Magnézium; Mangán; Omega mastné kyseliny; Draslík; Probiotiká; Proteín; Selén; Sodík; Spirulina; Vitamín A; Vitamín B; Vitamín C; Vitamín D; Vitamín E; Vitamín K; Zinok; Iné
zh-TW: 膳食營養補充品: 蘆薈; 大麻二酚 (CBD); 咖啡因; 鈣; 膠原; 肌酸; 電解質; 纖維; 碘; 鐵; 左旋肉鹼; 鎂; 錳; Omega 脂肪酸; 鉀; 益生菌; 蛋白質; 硒; 鈉; 螺旋藻; 維生素 A; 維生素 B; 維生素 C; 維生素 D; 維生素 E; 維生素 K; 鋅; 其他